Tennessee, session 114, HB1805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each LEA and public charter school shall provide age- and grade-appropriate
instruction to students on the history of communism. The instruction must include:
(1) The history of communism in the United States and domestic
communist movements, including the tactics of communist movements;
(2) Atrocities committed in foreign countries under the guidance of
communism;
(3) Comparative discussion of political ideologies, such as communism
and totalitarianism, which conflict with the principles of freedom and democracy
essential to the founding principles of the United States;
(4) The increasing threat of communism in the United States and to our
allies throughout the twentieth century, including the events of the Cultural
Revolution in the People's Republic of China and other mass killings from
communist regimes;
(5) The economic, industrial, and political events that preceded and
anticipated communist revolutions; and
(6) The communist policies of Cuba and the spread of communist
ideologies throughout Latin America, including the roots of the Communist Party
of Cuba and guerilla forces throughout Latin America.
HB1805
010422
- 1 -

(b) The department of education shall develop guidance to assist LEAs and
public charter schools in providing the age- and grade-appropriate instruction required in
this section, and may seek input from any individual who was a victim of communism or
any state- or nationally recognized organization dedicated to the victims of communism.
SECTION 2. For purposes of developing guidance for LEAs and public charter schools,
this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes,
this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and applies to the 2026-2027
school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 010422